Washington statutes.
RCW 4.52.020

Judgment to be rendered as in other cases.

Judgment shall be entered in the judgment book as in other cases, but without costs for any proceedings prior to the trial. The case, the submission and a copy of the judgment shall constitute the judgment roll.

[Code 1881 s 299; 1877 p 61 s 303; 1869 p 74 s 301; RRS s 379.]